che_lexd.lexd
LEXICON AdjAttrAbs
катаральни
отпускной
билгал
политически
майро
хотӀан
халарийн
метеорологически
луьйтан
аьтта
кабельни
прокурорски
тарни
гаечни
тӀаьхьарчулхьалхар
тайнигийн
дагаран
муьлха
квитанционни
дохалли
цӀе
борзанан
мерза
Ӏовдалн
чорпин
ракетни
ванди
алгебраически
булавки
метрически
пионерски
гениальни
бригадиран
юкъаршлахь[OblSame]
чамдин
календарни
операционни
дагестански
дегӀа
овесан
йира
лулара
сессин
индустриальни
археологически
залпа
мадарн
бандерольн
портан
принципиальни
байкин
цӀонгин
тиша
беранан
баймакхн
пуьнтан
бекхан
сарсалан
мехка
баккхий
хьесан
латински
баклажан
маьрсан
канцелярски
ахмецан
маршаллин
поппарн
межен
буржалн
дирстан
ниӀматан
гӀамарийн
гӀутакх
дукхаллин
гӀехь[OblSame]
беран
арифметйчески
къилбседера
ирча
лоьралли
пачхьалкхан
ден
кабинетни
тӀаусан
еаклассан
къехой
мангалан
протокольни
зуьнан
забаре
тукхаман
австралийски
ботанически
пашбукъан
варкъа
маккхалн
къолам
ирхе
лазархойн
цхьанацӀеран
екъана[Agr]
туьканан
директорски
буру
байракхн
кхузара
мацахлеран
шайнан
сакхте
койн
картоли
ямартхой
цабезаме
шинаэтажан
кисетан
комедийни
билгалза
печата
машинан
азиатски
шадалойн
гарса
чӀебарлой
верас
кхокъалин
перпендикулярни
гӀалгӀайн
кеманхой
баьнка
дастаме
пошмен
къемате
психически
дозан
дукхакъаьмний
парийн
кахтойн
националистически
бошхепан
мукъа
косказа
шинасохьтан
кицан
куцхьарамн
цӀерпоштнекъан
профессорски
гӀиллакхиехь[OblSame]
месал
кӀелара
ахкарган
старгӀин
чухулара
шаьлган
къонон
корматалли
десятични
маршальски
муьрга
пересадки
уьшалан
зоьртала
дийдийн
неха
перон
газета
контурни
пехий
поьпа
билгалзан
йоккхачутоьпан
иччархойн
бекха
ткъесан
сирла
кӀелхьара
монгольски
силаман
гомха
нецин
коьжалга
четарн
чимчаргӀин
кхаарга
чиллалелорхойн
ваьссан
месала
кхоан
масарн
ямартан
биъкогболу
къилбан
охьарн
чоме
пассивни
кхинойн
лами
суворовски
окшойн
сутара
аполитични
колхозехь[OblSame]
атта
хьуьнаре
тӀехь[OblSame]
орденски
аразн
дегтаьрни
фонетически
юбкин
доӀах
умматан
йочанен
буьха
юьртан
кхеран
большевистски
ворхӀдийнан
генеральски
стаканан
гай
доттагӀийн
делаӀодан
пачхье
лазартнин
июньски
мехкан
моторни
перманентни
хӀетахь[OblSame]
юккъера
бӀаьлга
оппортунистски
посылочни
меха
акъари
автономни
довхой
кхекхорга
мехкаде
баллистически
акаци
мукъо
исбаьхьа
гильзийн
каникулярни
галантерейни
лулахой
буьнтан
чардакхан
ода
хьорзаман
автоматически
оккупационни
цӀерметдешан
милкан
жухарган
комсомольски
дарцан
комически
паргӀатдаккхархойн
бероза
маьлха
плитки
вовшахтохархойн
пола
дерригхалкъан
барчан
гонахара
хӀоан
кажар
харжаран
кегийран
дешархойн
дема
исхарийн
помидора
жуьзан
баьллийн
туьран
шинаметтан
перфораторн
пролетарски
ахшеран
цӀокъберган
дукъарца
енан
зезагн
меа
тӀайн
сиха
цӀина
заман
лега
революционни
хоршин
халкъан
боькха
черон
вертан
телатан
психиатрически
зӀенар
долан
диларий
маьлхан
ламарой
хӀинцалера
эсар
бегаше
бӀаьрган
кӀоршаме
маьнги
дерца
зудчаллин
мерзан
кӀайн
хийистера
гӀоматн
цхьанадийнан
баби
исбаьхьаллин
докъар
сийнан
диалектико-материалистически
кухни
лакхара
марзон
бурчан
туркойн
тӀекханан
хулчин
йозан
ноябрьски
беца
даьхнилелорхой
аьлхийн
таьлсийн
хьоьхан
тоффинехь[OblSame]
десантни
поэтически
мeхала
диспетчерски
бамби
вовшахтохархой
готтон
лоьма
шийло
шораллин
архивни
юкъараллин
ирасаболу
бухаройн
аьстан
госпитальни
сингаттаме
ирхен
гӀордаз
логан
торгӀала
буьрса
гӀуллакхера
комитетски
меттатӀехьарн
замойн
цӀазамийн
халон
сарахь[OblSame]
энжеде
цӀeн
дуткъон
дехой
бамбин
клюквенни
печатан
машаре
нуьйран
олхазарий
идейно-политически
уьйтӀара
кхаари
гвардейски
меса
номерн
парфюмерни
эний
пхенийн
кхекхий
хьалхара
дакъадалаз
цӀакалера
гӀурбан
тӀуьзан
варварски
рамин
дарин
сурсаталлин
чаккхармин
бӀаьргийн
даьхнилелорхойн
берозан
динан
парашютни
тӀехулара
бӀесоьман
майрон
балозн
веназн
оьрсий
номер
долозаннг
килсан
цхьанадешдекъан
къинхетамазалли
лекторски
балкхарой
кӀeда-мерза
тоххарлера
муьтӀахь[OblSame]
совкхан
империалистически
пакгаузн
аьчкан
шифонан
яппарийн
дуганан
курдой
поьпан
тӀоьлган
композиторски
цхьанатайпанан
доккхо
акацин
къорза
египетски
керл-керла
интернациональни
тӀелхиган
чӀера
слесарни
хьарам
дастама
цӀорзан
дерстан
мраморни
лергъюххер
муьжан
стиман
чорхан
гоьлан
тӀуьна
можа
кхачан
къинхетамазаллин
эригн
тӀехбеттаме
керста
хураман
деша
марочни
хьаькаман
артезиански
дискуссионни
лулахь[OblSame]
кхерамен
ваьсса
юткъа-еха
аьхкен
къоранан
кхаарин
расови
даларн
хьеханан
юьртабахаман
баьццара
агрономически
буьйдан
фински
ленински
бедан
нийса[OblSame]
хеннахь[OblSame]
февральски
ахнабар
мехкашдӀалецархой
мостагӀаллин
кегийрхой
кеманхойн
корпусни
краеведчески
пачкин
зоотехнически
алашон
далар
суьйренан
дийннан
эмалка
кандидатски
боьзан
нора
пийсак
сира
юьман
зурман
козырийн
шрифтан
биографически
перфоратор
машаний
кварцеви
баьллий
паднара
мужалтан
хӀинцалера
бурча
мокхо
кинематографически
буьйран
копаркерстан
бугӀан
къоро
кӀорни
хьоме
шайтӀанан
атмосферни
зингатий
мосалгӀа
бела
эхашер
зене
хьечийн
вотан
английски
гомхо
яйдакх
торгӀала
нахар
дашон
новкъахь[OblSame]
жухара
патриархальни
сорса
кхелахой
эхасоьман
марехь[OblSame]
бухӀан
патарн
цомгуш
хала
пазатан
нӀаьвцицига
акхаройн
сонара
шинаметтиган
чевнан
гома
Ӏуналли
аьрга
омонимически
цхьаллин
чухин
шуьйро
буьркан
пӀелга
территориальни
чоин
бакълуьйриг
аьршан
сискалгӀин
алон
лахара
кевстигн
чӀегӀардиг
марксистски
бӀаьстен
тӀеххаза
гоьжан
исбаьхьалли
оьгӀазе
кристаллически
къен
синонимйчески
эвхьаза
жухарга
квадратни
юкъахь[OblSame]
астагӀа
пелхьон
къорзон
чӀениган
аьчка
чарин
ногӀийн
акхтарган
сийна
коӀан
эпсаран
тоьлушха
Ӏожа
крахмальни
бахьане
процентйоцу
июльски
дийнан
сихо
човкин
тоьпан
цӀехон
куьйгалхойн
чӀинган
кӀай
почтови
хало
гӀундалгӀин
помидоран
эхьен
эсала
кӀен
мехкашдӀалецархойн
бӀахаллин
доттагӀий
йоьза
апельсинан
проблемни
юткъо
къийзорган
сахьтан
космически
докъан
биъсабари
эскархойн
газтайпан
колхозни
маьхьаран
хьолан
хьаьжкӀин
чертан
метафизически
вежарий
тӀорказан
хьуьнзаводан
кӀиранан
отставной
куьран
апрельски
зуламхойн
пана
екъан[Agr]
Ӏаьржо
дерта
серлонан
орзан
уьрсан
кӀорамуьсталлин
таьӀно
лампин
бахаман
улхан
машинашъярхой
меда
ловзарн
зуламхой
гидротехнически
ярмаркин
Ӏилман
элтаран
собаре
долалли
хӀордан
коьчал
пакгауз
кхетаме
баьсса
хакасски
аьхза
бес-бесара
капитански
къарачойн
стомарлера
арахь[OblSame]
лурчахлера
басми
чӀапа
механ
комплексни
товбецан
гӀоьналлин
еза
цигахь[OblSame]
эладитанен
хьошаллин
Ӏаьржа
балкхаройн
хьеран
географически
кӀелахь[OblSame]
адыгейски
пенсионни
аьхкалера
чӀерийлелорхой
пиратски
тарсалан
кӀезин
баьлчан
Ӏаьвнан
зударий
кегий
дешарн
аьрто
бухарой
къийгийн
антагонистически
селедкин
месалн
кӀунзал
шиферан
кетӀар
куцдешан
сенин
ангали
практически
колониальни
административни
иркен
меттатӀехьар
дерригхалкъа
башлакх
йортан
херхан
тидаме
эхаколони
комиссионни
сантиметран
кевстиг
къаьмний
ахчан
классни
кхартматтане
кӀомал
шийла
гара
байки
цӀегӀо-хьаьрса
тергаме
эзаршеран
белорусски
денденнена
чуьркан
аспирантски
зингатийн
сарахьлера
амархойн
аьрруагӀорн
маьрша
корсан
неци
хьаьрсо
хьехаран
кафедральни
методически
букъсуьрта
казахски
куьллий
леган
дадолагн
пхьаркенан
весета
цӀуран
красноармейски
къин
цӀейоцу
вокзала
Ӏайлера
энжe
тайпанан
уллохь[OblSame]
бӀаьлланга
дахкарн
чӀамар
чӀегӀардигн
байракх
декхарийлахь[OblSame]
элийн
вешин
аьртон
лакхаюккъехь[OblSame]
кемсий
дарбане
толаман
чӀишталган
осала
стоьмийн
цхьанааьзнийн
эвлаяан
даймехканнг
къийзорга
ламаройн
хьена
паьшкан
вкладной
газированни
кӀолдан
гӀоьналли
узаман
даьсса[Agr]
анатомически
пхьуьйшан
бурам
некан
эладитане
урдонан
цӀахь[OblSame]
ангалин
шагатӀулган
ӀиндагӀ
газови
йоькханен
стохкалера
махмарн
бодане
кечдархой
цергийн
дега
Ӏаьржон
чуханан
аитн
цхьогалан
костан
девзигн
ветан
гилан
рейкин
цхьанабесан
еза[Agr]
кхекхорган
дӀагара
кешний
синтаксически
педагогически
Ӏуьйрен
питани
чайлелорхойн
патентни
соьман
патармин
бригадира
муьста
мухаллин
бумбари
цӀазамн
бешлелорхойн
искаьртик
чиркхан
гӀоран
даьӀан
кӀотарар
нагахь[OblSame]
зуламен
шовинистически
бесар
пхора
дешдекъа
беса
европейски
къорон
кӀесар
ловзар
диршан
ерригроссий
луларн
маьӀа
геодезически
формалистически
гӀорасизн
бӀаьргий
аджарски
газетан
эрмалойн
маьӀӀера
ниӀмата
кубически
ира
хьаьжан
мадар
ейн
бухкара
нартола
дипломатически
кхаасаберган
дико
кишмийн
цхьанахенара
накъоста
куйнан
малхбалеран
мозийдойург
кега-мерса
бӀаьсталера
ханнийн
эстрадни
денденде
берга
маьркӀажен
пайден
мерзо
салоран
оьпан
еакласса
турпалаллин
артистически
дӀаьвше
дикторски
диларийн
алкогольни
кхетамен
кхаъкхаллорн
гӀунан
перо
аьттуагӀорн
гӀунжара
бӀаьвнийн
магӀарн
йовлакхн
кавказхойн
нахарн
беснин
марша
антични
литературоведчески
жима
кхоа
боргӀалн
болатан
пхатоьдин
чӀеран
мартовски
цуьрган
ткъаршин
пальмови
обаргий
гаран
парламентерски
бӀесоьма
баӀа
наштар
цхьаназаманан
дегӀан
октябрьски
туьманан
чӀамара
харданган
эран
бӀегӀигн
халкъабахамаллин
дархой
хӀонцан
беркате
айдардешан
аьрруагӀор
беданан
арен
сабин
корса
мелон
морса
пхьакочеран
цӀенойн
докторски
чкъуран
килса
кӀайн
хӀетахьлера
хена
башмакх
алаши
исхарий
къинхьегаме
вертикальни
кедрови
банковски
вандин
бета
терминологически
можа-хьаьрса
букъсуьртан
кхаасаберга
оьнан
тракторни
доьшучохь[OblSame]
муьстон
дийнахь[OblSame]
коллективни
параллельни
цӀогадоца
бӀешеран
тӀаьхьдешнийн
мехкарий
тӀерган
больнични
шинадекъан
конвейерни
къинхьегамхойн
гезгмашин
махар
кӀеззиг
белха
графически
чуьйнан
шочан
пошме
бешлелорхой
кӀарула-Ӏаьржа
ямарта
чоьнан
фельдшерски
дукхалли
турбинни
жерахь[OblSame]
паьшка
антифашистски
ахгорга
леганан
хӀурдан
катастрофически
мерзон
адмиральски
айпен
пайхамарин
дилхалахь[OblSame]
каде
хьомсара
беабетта
кетар
букъа
беакога
лахахь[OblSame]
первобытни
пастин
довхойн
аптечни
хӀирийн
кадрови
кхоллархой
варкъан
кислородни
де
дешначохь[OblSame]
бегӀийла
туьркийн
генеральни
порта
юьхьенцара
стоммо
маьршан
байта
делазхой
овеса
хенара
рузбанан
докъа
билгалон
мела
муьсто
цхьа
тхевнан
кхуран
пошмакхн
зӀиймарган
цӀерпоштан
ялтин
тӀапан
шераюккъера
цӀоганан
сирникийн
тесан
гӀургӀеза
кхераме
бухенгар
къамкъарга
хьокъан
макъарн
къинхьегамхой
маликий
патриотически
тогӀенан
цӀен
бӀостанан
заьнгал
суьйлийн
бажин
магӀараллин
кегийрхойн
билетни
монументальни
сирла-можа
белан
божарий
полан
кӀунзалн
чӀапа
клинически
уллера
деган
коьма
аварийни
музейн
таллархойн
мостагӀалли
кхерча
къуй
баьццар
эстетически
къeра
курьерски
эгӀаза
декъала
юкъаметтера
мукъон
безаме
помещик
союзни
вира
эриг
бӀахойн
хьакхарчийлелорхойн
эсарн
эхасохьтан
йиран
гинсу
базан
трамвайни
йишхаьлларг
залпан
гӀундалгӀи
куьйран
уьрдан
тхьазаран
поварской
стешхо
подшипник
испански
тӀехьар
чӀоьбан
шорта
миска
булан
ирригационни
актуальни
гов-гиввехь[OblSame]
къонахчаллин
аит
пешан
хийра
екъа[Agr]
йоькхане
ал
диаметральни
мандатни
пазата
гомхон
Ӏонжар
лирически
боьмаша
хьогаме
бани
ткъенан
бабин
пхийн
опиумни
тайша
духчун
туьпан
куьйса
луьста
ахкарга
дийннахьехь[OblSame]
йилбазмеха
къeпе
округ
махмар
эхье
каной
масалан
кула
пезагийн
физико-математически
догмайра
панан
бригада
кавказски
цицан
коммунистически
тӀодийн
синкхетаме
кхоллархойн
докъарн
стеран
аламан
кӀези
терзанан
къаьмнийн
мeкара
шога
куцдеша
астрономически
кховри
турпалан
наггахь[OblSame]
пиджакан
гӀоргӀа
жулар
патар
поппар
жуьза
бактериологически
совгӀатан
организациояни
бульваран
поха
декъаза
диетически
махорки
медальни
хьелийн
мазлагӀ
даӀам
къоьжо
товханан
кишмий
цецан
цӀогадеха
къинхетаме
цӀасталера
бацойн
шатайпанара
талбин
оьрза
королевски
сухарийн
беламе
доьзалхой
мехийн
питанин
веназ
шеврон
ремонтни
галморзаха
кавказхой
чергасийн
мацахлера
балдин
нуьйдан
факультативни
векалн
просветительни
теоретически
пхьаран
нӀаьвцициган
китайски
прогрессивни
тӀeра
валовой
ворхӀкепека
хуьтан
дукъан
каракалпакски
лулар
минометни
объеман
бӀахой
гочдархой
кесар
объема
даьӀахка
махарн
меттан
тӀоьрмиган
кохкарн
барометрически
догӀанан
пачхьен
тӀуьнан
архитектурни
металлургически
хечин
дукъа
тхин
элий
диалектически
кхожан
полиграфически
готта
къаьхьо
кӀирандийн
юьхан
дадолаг
машарен
декъахойн
отчетни
куьпан
контрреволюционни
меттаюккъера
итшера
тапчин
ламин
мелкобуржуазни
шинабесан
тӀоман
халстун
асан
патарми
Ӏуьн
кхе
лергъюххерн
мекара
венгерски
орза
гӀурми
ахархой
динберган
токхонан
аптекарски
эсало
цамзин
хоршан
дошлой
дефицитни
мелкотоварни
стен
сирло
